public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.aff
PFX g 0 לכשכ" .
PFX g 0 לכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשכב וו
PFX g 0 לכשכב" .
PFX g 0 לכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשככ וו
PFX g 0 לכשככ" .
PFX g 0 לכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשכל וו
PFX g 0 לכשכל" .
PFX g 0 לכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשכמ וו
PFX g 0 לכשכמ" .
PFX g 0 לכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשל וו
PFX g 0 לכשל" .
PFX g 0 לכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשלכ וו
PFX g 0 לכשלכ" .
PFX g 0 לכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשמ וו
PFX g 0 לכשמ" .
PFX g 0 לכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 לכשמכ וו
PFX g 0 לכשמכ" .
PFX g 0 לכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 מ [^ו]
PFX g 0 מ וו
PFX g 0 מ" .
PFX g 0 מו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 מב [^ו]
PFX g 0 מב וו
PFX g 0 מב" .
PFX g 0 מבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 מכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 מכ וו
PFX g 0 מכ" .
PFX g 0 מכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 מל [^ו]
PFX g 0 מל וו
PFX g 0 מל" .
PFX g 0 מלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משב [^ו]
PFX g 0 משב וו
PFX g 0 משב" .
PFX g 0 משבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 משבכ וו
PFX g 0 משבכ" .
PFX g 0 משבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 משכ וו
PFX g 0 משכ" .
PFX g 0 משכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 משכב וו
PFX g 0 משכב" .
PFX g 0 משכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 משככ וו
PFX g 0 משככ" .
PFX g 0 משככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 משכל וו
PFX g 0 משכל" .
PFX g 0 משכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 משכמ וו
PFX g 0 משכמ" .
PFX g 0 משכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משל [^ו]
PFX g 0 משל וו
PFX g 0 משל" .
PFX g 0 משלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 משלכ וו
PFX g 0 משלכ" .
PFX g 0 משלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 משמ וו
PFX g 0 משמ" .
PFX g 0 משמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 משמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 משמכ וו
PFX g 0 משמכ" .
PFX g 0 משמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שב [^ו]
PFX g 0 שב וו
PFX g 0 שב" .
PFX g 0 שבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שבכ וו
PFX g 0 שבכ" .
PFX g 0 שבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכ וו
PFX g 0 שכ" .
PFX g 0 שכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכב וו
PFX g 0 שכב" .
PFX g 0 שכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שככ וו
PFX g 0 שככ" .
PFX g 0 שככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכל וו
PFX g 0 שכל" .
PFX g 0 שכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכמ וו
PFX g 0 שכמ" .
PFX g 0 שכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשב וו
PFX g 0 שכשב" .
PFX g 0 שכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשבכ וו
PFX g 0 שכשבכ" .
PFX g 0 שכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשכ וו
PFX g 0 שכשכ" .
PFX g 0 שכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשכב וו
PFX g 0 שכשכב" .
PFX g 0 שכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשככ וו
PFX g 0 שכשככ" .
PFX g 0 שכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשכל וו
PFX g 0 שכשכל" .
PFX g 0 שכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשכמ וו
PFX g 0 שכשכמ" .
PFX g 0 שכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשל וו
PFX g 0 שכשל" .
PFX g 0 שכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשלכ וו
PFX g 0 שכשלכ" .
PFX g 0 שכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשמ וו
PFX g 0 שכשמ" .
PFX g 0 שכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שכשמכ וו
PFX g 0 שכשמכ" .
PFX g 0 שכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 של [^ו]
PFX g 0 של וו
PFX g 0 של" .
PFX g 0 שלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכ וו
PFX g 0 שלכ" .
PFX g 0 שלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשב וו
PFX g 0 שלכשב" .
PFX g 0 שלכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשבכ וו
PFX g 0 שלכשבכ" .
PFX g 0 שלכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשכ וו
PFX g 0 שלכשכ" .
PFX g 0 שלכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשכב וו
PFX g 0 שלכשכב" .
PFX g 0 שלכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשככ וו
PFX g 0 שלכשככ" .
PFX g 0 שלכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשכל וו
PFX g 0 שלכשכל" .
PFX g 0 שלכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשכמ וו
PFX g 0 שלכשכמ" .
PFX g 0 שלכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשל וו
PFX g 0 שלכשל" .
PFX g 0 שלכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשלכ וו
PFX g 0 שלכשלכ" .
PFX g 0 שלכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשמ וו
PFX g 0 שלכשמ" .
PFX g 0 שלכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שלכשמכ וו
PFX g 0 שלכשמכ" .
PFX g 0 שלכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמ וו
PFX g 0 שמ" .
PFX g 0 שמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמכ וו
PFX g 0 שמכ" .
PFX g 0 שמכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשב [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשב וו
PFX g 0 שמשב" .
PFX g 0 שמשבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשבכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשבכ וו
PFX g 0 שמשבכ" .
PFX g 0 שמשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשכ וו
PFX g 0 שמשכ" .
PFX g 0 שמשכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשכב [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשכב וו
PFX g 0 שמשכב" .
PFX g 0 שמשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשככ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשככ וו
PFX g 0 שמשככ" .
PFX g 0 שמשככו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשכל [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשכל וו
PFX g 0 שמשכל" .
PFX g 0 שמשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשכמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשכמ וו
PFX g 0 שמשכמ" .
PFX g 0 שמשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשל [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשל וו
PFX g 0 שמשל" .
PFX g 0 שמשלו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשלכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשלכ וו
PFX g 0 שמשלכ" .
PFX g 0 שמשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשמ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשמ וו
PFX g 0 שמשמ" .
PFX g 0 שמשמו ו[^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשמכ [^ו]
PFX g 0 שמשמכ וו
PFX g 0 שמשמכ" .
PFX g 0 שמשמכו ו[^ו]

PFX h N 16
PFX h 0 ב [^ו]
PFX h 0 ב וו
PFX h 0 ב" .
PFX h 0 בו ו[^ו]
PFX h 0 וב [^ו]
PFX h 0 וב וו
PFX h 0 וב" .
PFX h 0 ובו ו[^ו]
PFX h 0 ושב [^ו]
PFX h 0 ושב וו
PFX h 0 ושב" .
PFX h 0 ושבו ו[^ו]
PFX h 0 שב [^ו]
PFX h 0 שב וו
PFX h 0 שב" .
PFX h 0 שבו ו[^ו]

PFX i N 74
PFX i 0 ב [^ו]
PFX i 0 ב וו
PFX i 0 ב" .
PFX i 0 בו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 ו .
PFX i 0 ו" .
PFX i 0 וב [^ו]
PFX i 0 וב וו
PFX i 0 וב" .
PFX i 0 ובו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 וכש [^ו]
PFX i 0 וכש וו
PFX i 0 וכש" .
PFX i 0 וכשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 ולכש [^ו]
PFX i 0 ולכש וו
PFX i 0 ולכש" .
PFX i 0 ולכשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 ומש [^ו]
PFX i 0 ומש וו
PFX i 0 ומש" .
PFX i 0 ומשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 וש [^ו]
PFX i 0 וש וו
PFX i 0 וש" .
PFX i 0 ושו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 ושב [^ו]
PFX i 0 ושב וו
PFX i 0 ושב" .
PFX i 0 ושבו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 ושכש [^ו]
PFX i 0 ושכש וו
PFX i 0 ושכש" .
PFX i 0 ושכשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 ושלכש [^ו]
PFX i 0 ושלכש וו
PFX i 0 ושלכש" .
PFX i 0 ושלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 ושמש [^ו]
PFX i 0 ושמש וו
PFX i 0 ושמש" .
PFX i 0 ושמשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 כש [^ו]
PFX i 0 כש וו
PFX i 0 כש" .
PFX i 0 כשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 לכש [^ו]
PFX i 0 לכש וו
PFX i 0 לכש" .
PFX i 0 לכשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 מש [^ו]
PFX i 0 מש וו
PFX i 0 מש" .
PFX i 0 משו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 ש [^ו]
PFX i 0 ש וו
PFX i 0 ש" .
PFX i 0 שו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 שב [^ו]
PFX i 0 שב וו
PFX i 0 שב" .
PFX i 0 שבו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 שכש [^ו]
PFX i 0 שכש וו
PFX i 0 שכש" .
PFX i 0 שכשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 שלכש [^ו]
PFX i 0 שלכש וו
PFX i 0 שלכש" .
PFX i 0 שלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX i 0 שמש [^ו]
PFX i 0 שמש וו
PFX i 0 שמש" .
PFX i 0 שמשו ו[^ו]

NEEDAFFIX j
