public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.dic
אונננו/hj
אזול/g
אזקו/i
אחדה/g
אחדנו/g
אחלכן/hj
איימה/i
אייתכם/hj
אייתם/i
אלחשנו/i
אלצה/g
אלצנו/g
אמצני/g
אנפפך/hj
אפיינה/i
ארבם/i
ארותכם/hj
ארעם/i
אשרו/g
אששו/g
אששני/g
באשן/hj
בדרה/g
בהקה/i
בוששך/hj
בזרה/g
בזרנו/g
בחשנו/i
בטאם/g
בטוש/g
בטלו/g
ביימכם/hj
בייתם/i
בלבלן/hj
בלף/g
בלפך/hj
בנאמה/i
בסמם/g
בסס/g
בססן/g
בערן/g
בצעני/g
בקעני/g
בקשם/g
ברברו/i
ברברך/hj
ברכני/g
בשם/g
בתרו/g
בתרני/g
גבבן/g
גבהן/hj
גבש/g
גבשן/g
גדלן/g
גהץ/g
גהצה/hj
גהרה/i
גוזכם/hj
גזמנו/i
גחכה/g
גחכנו/g
גלח/g
גלחן/g
גלמך/hj
גמדני/g
גמרך/hj
גנזו/i
גערכם/hj
גרדם/g
גרז/g
גרסכם/hj
גרעה/i
דאבן/hj
דגור/g
דגמנך/hj
דגרו/i
דהרם/hj
דונני/g
דושכם/hj
דייקו/i
דלג/g
דמיינך/hj
דסקסנו/i
דעכן/hj
דפנני/g
דשדשנו/i
האהילכן/hj
האירנו/hj
האמינו/i
הבאישכם/hj
הבזיקה/i
הבחינן/hj
הבריאנו/hj
הבריזה/i
הגחיככן/hj
הגידו/i
הגיען/hj
הגניבו/i
הגננו/hj
הדרימם/hj
הואילה/i
הוונכן/hj
הונותן/hj
הזדהמנו/i
הזדחלן/hj
הזדמנו/i
הזדנבן/hj
הזדעקה/i
הזדקקך/hj
הזדרזנו/i
הזידכן/hj
הזנותי/hj
הזעימו/i
החוותנו/hj
החליטו/i
החלך/hj
החסירם/hj
החציפה/i
החשידכן/hj
היאגרך/hj
היאור/g
היאותן/hj
היאכלכם/hj
היאלם/g
היאמדנו/hj
היאנקם/hj
היאסף/g
היאצרנו/hj
היבגדכן/hj
היבדל/g
היבזזה/hj
היבלל/g
היבללן/hj
היבעלה/hj
היבקע/g
היבקעם/hj
היגדענו/hj
היגזם/g
היגזרכן/hj
היגמען/hj
היגעל/g
היגרבכם/hj
היגרפנו/hj
הידבר/g
הידהמכן/hj
הידחפנו/hj
הידלדלנו/i
הידללן/hj
הידפס/g
הידרכה/hj
היהדפכם/hj
היהרס/g
היהרסם/hj
היוועדך/hj
היוורש/g
היוושען/hj
היזכרכן/hj
היזמר/g
היזקפה/hj
היחבט/g
היחגרך/hj
היחלב/g
היחלצן/hj
היחנך/g
היחסמנו/hj
היחצץ/g
היחרטה/hj
היחרש/g
היחתכך/hj
היטבח/g
היטלטלו/i
היטמנכם/hj
היטען/g
היכבותם/hj
היכזב/g
היכמרנו/hj
היכסף/g
היכשלה/hj
הילבש/g
הילחמם/hj
הילפת/g
הימדדן/hj
הימזג/g
הימחצם/hj
הימלך/g
הימסקן/hj
הימצץ/g
הימתחה/hj
הינאם/g
הינזק/g
הינזקך/hj
הינעץ/g
הינעצכן/hj
הינשף/g
הינתזם/hj
היסדק/g
היסחטנו/hj
היסלח/g
היספרה/hj
היסרג/g
היעורכם/hj
היעזר/g
היענשכן/hj
היעצב/g
היערם/g
היערמם/hj
היפגש/g
היפוצן/hj
היפער/g
היפצעם/hj
היפרע/g
היפרקן/hj
היצבר/g
היצלותם/hj
היצרך/g
היקבעכן/hj
היקטם/g
היקלותכם/hj
היקצר/g
היקרעך/hj
הירדף/g
הירטטכם/hj
הירעש/g
הירקבך/hj
הירתע/g
הישאפכם/hj
הישגב/g
הישחקך/hj
הישכר/g
הישלמכן/hj
הישמט/g
הישפטן/hj
הישקף/g
היתבענו/hj
היתכן/g
היתמרו/i
היתקלה/hj
היתקף/g
הכליאכן/hj
הכתיפה/i
המגנם/hj
המהמה/i
המעיטו/i
המריאם/hj
הניבו/i
הסותי/hj
הסכינו/i
הססכן/hj
הסתאבו/i
הסתגרה/i
הסתודדם/hj
הסתופפו/i
הסתייענו/i
הסתלסלו/i
הסתלסלכם/hj
הסתמרה/i
הסתערבה/i
הסתערבכן/hj
הסתקרנו/i
העטירו/i
העטירכם/hj
העריבו/i
העתירנו/hj
הפליאו/i
הפנותי/hj
הפצירה/i
הצדיעו/i
הצהירם/hj
הצטדקה/i
הצטיירנו/i
הצטללן/hj
הצטמגה/i
הצטנענו/i
הצטערכן/hj
הצ'טקמקה/i
הצלו/i
הצניחכם/hj
הקבילה/i
הקניטן/hj
הקפידה/i
הרהרה/i
הרהרן/hj
הרקיעו/i
הרקיעך/hj
השלותכן/hj
השמינו/i
השתבצה/i
השתגעם/hj
השתדלו/i
השתופפנו/i
השתחצה/i
השתחצכן/hj
השתינה/i
השתכרה/i
השתכרן/hj
השתלטו/i
השתמענו/i
השתנקם/hj
השתעממה/i
השתפנו/i
השתקעכם/hj
השתקפה/i
השתרעו/i
התאבדנו/i
התאבלך/hj
התאגרפו/i
התאזרו/i
התאחדכם/hj
התאכזבה/i
התאמנה/i
התאסלמכם/hj
התאפקו/i
התארכה/i
התאשפזם/hj
התבארו/i
התבהמנו/i
התבוססכם/hj
התבוששו/i
התבייתי/i
התבסמנו/i
התבצעך/hj
התברברה/i
התבשמה/i
התגברן/hj
התגודדו/i
התגייסו/i
התגלמכם/hj
התגלענו/i
התגעגעה/i
התגשמן/hj
התגשמנו/i
התהדרו/i
התהפנטנו/i
התווכחכן/hj
התחבאה/i
התחדדו/i
התחזקכן/hj
התחזקנו/i
התחלחלו/i
התחמשה/i
התחמשן/hj
התחסלה/i
התחצפנו/i
התחרבננו/hj
התחרשה/i
התחתנה/i
התחתרך/hj
התיידדנו/i
התייחמו/i
התיילדם/hj
התייסרה/i
התייפייפו/i
התיישבכם/hj
התיישרה/i
התכדרנו/i
התכוננם/hj
התכחשה/i
התכפרו/i
התכתשנו/i
התל/g
התלבטכם/hj
התלהמו/i
התלטפה/i
התלטשכן/hj
התלפפו/i
התמוגגה/i
התמודדן/hj
התמזגו/i
התמירו/i
התמכרן/hj
התמסדו/i
התמצאנו/i
התמקמם/hj
התמרדה/i
התמתחו/i
התנגנה/i
התנגנכם/hj
התנהגנו/i
התנועעו/i
התנופפם/hj
התנחלנו/i
התנמנמה/i
התנסחם/hj
התנפלו/i
התנצרנו/i
התנשאכן/hj
התנשפה/i
התעגלו/i
התעוותן/i
התעופפכם/hj
התעייפנו/i
התעלפה/i
התעממך/hj
התעמקו/i
התעננה/i
התעצלן/hj
התעצמו/i
התערבבנו/i
התערפלה/i
התעשרם/hj
התפארו/i
התפוקקנו/i
התפחסן/hj
התפטמה/i
התפלאו/i
התפלספנו/i
התפלצם/hj
התפספסה/i
התפצלו/i
התפקששכן/hj
התפרנסנו/i
התפרקדה/i
התפשרו/i
התפתחכן/hj
התקבצנו/i
התקוממה/i
התקילכם/hj
התקלסנו/i
התקנאו/i
התקצצם/hj
התקצרנו/i
התקרצפה/i
התקשרו/i
התראיינכן/hj
התרגעה/i
התרוממו/i
התרועען/hj
התרוששו/i
התרטבנו/i
התריסכן/hj
התרסנה/i
התרפסה/i
התרפקכן/hj
התרתחו/i
זהרם/hj
זלול/g
זללו/i
זקקן/g
זרקו/i
זרקן/hj
חבבם/g
חדד/g
חדשו/g
חווטו/i
חזקנו/g
חטבנו/i
חייגך/hj
חלטנו/i
חלצני/g
חממנו/g
חנטה/i
חנטכן/hj
חסוך/g
חסלני/g
חפפה/i
חפש/g
חקור/g
חרגם/hj
חרדו/i
חרתם/i
חשלן/g
חתלן/g
טוחכם/hj
טזז/g
טייבנו/i
טנפו/g
טפסם/hj
טרחנו/i
יבשו/i
יהפככם/i
ייאשנו/i
ייבבך/hj
ייחדה/i
ייללם/hj
ייסדו/i
ייערה/i
ינקי/hj
ינקכן/i
ירותך/i
כבדני/g
כוונם/g
כחדם/hj
כייפה/i
כערה/g
כפתי/i
כרבלך/hj
לגום/g
להטטך/hj
לחששו/i
לטף/g
לקטני/g
מגרו/g
מדרה/hj
מלטו/g
מלכדנו/i
ממשה/g
ממשני/g
מנפך/hj
מקדו/g
מקמו/g
מרר/g
מתננו/g
נאמכם/hj
נאצנו/g
נבענו/i
נדבם/g
נדנדן/hj
נדנדנו/i
נהלם/g
נום/g
נחמו/g
נטותה/hj
נכחו/i
נכש/g
נסרה/g
נסרני/g
נפותכן/hj
נפקו/g
נקבני/g
נקדנו/g
נקזו/g
נקטו/i
נשום/g
נשנשנו/i
נתחני/g
נתצן/g
סבול/g
סבסדכם/hj
סובו/g
סווגני/g
סכלנו/g
סכננו/g
סלדו/i
סלפכם/hj
סמא/g
סנוט/g
סננן/g
ספדכם/hj
ספדנו/i
סרב/g
סרסן/g
עגוב/g
עדנני/g
עוטם/hj
עיינה/i
עכב/g
עכבני/g
עכלן/g
עמול/g
עממה/hj
ענגם/g
עקוף/g
עקלנו/g
עקמם/g
עקצצו/i
ערגך/hj
ערוב/g
פגל/g
פוגגכם/hj
פוררו/i
פזול/g
פזרם/g
פטמנו/g
פייחך/hj
פלל/g
פלמרו/i
פנותי/hj
פנקנו/g
פצלם/g
פצרה/i
פקען/hj
פרפו/i
פרקני/g
פשותן/hj
פשקה/g
פתל/g
צופפכם/hj
צחקקנו/i
צטט/g
צטטנו/g
צמקכן/hj
צפור/g
צקצקנו/i
צרבם/hj
צרפן/g
קבצו/g
קדשו/g
קוב/g
קזזם/g
קטבך/hj
קייצה/i
קלל/g
קללני/g
קנוס/g
קנחנו/g
קנטרכן/hj
קרצנו/i
קרקפכם/hj
קרר/g
רגוש/g
רגזך/hj
רהטן/g
רזותנו/hj
רחקה/i
רטוט/g
רככה/g
רכל/g
רססנו/g
רפדני/g
רפרפן/hj
רקמו/i
רתעם/hj
רתקו/g
שבוק/g
שגעה/g
שגשגו/i
שדכה/g
שדלם/g
שהקן/hj
שווע/g
שחד/g
שחדנו/g
שטמם/hj
שימני/g
שכשכו/i
שלמם/g
שמחם/g
שננה/g
שנס/g
שנענו/hj
שפדה/g
שפדני/g
שפצן/g
שפרן/g
שקוט/g
שקללם/hj
שקמני/g
שקצן/g
שקשקה/i
שרוק/g
שתותו/hj
שתפו/g
תאגדי/i
תאר/g
תבלם/g
תזמנן/i
תחבכן/hj
תמהנו/i
תנותי/hj
תסוס/g
תעבי/i
תעבני/g
תעל/g
תפקדה/i
תקצרכם/i
תרגלכם/hj
תרצם/i
